North Dakota statutes. TITLE 27 Judicial Branch of Government
CHAPTER 27-22 Interstate Compact on Juveniles [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 230, §
5]

27-22-01.
Legislative findings and policy. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1969, ch. 291, § 1; repealed by 2015, ch. 230, § 5, effective August 1, 2015.

27-22-02.
Execution of compact — Text. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1969, ch. 291, § 2; 2007, ch. 119, § 14; repealed by 2015, ch. 230, § 5, effective August 1, 2015.

27-22-03.
Juvenile compact administrator. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1969, ch. 291, § 3; repealed by 2015, hb1119, § 5, effective August 1, 2015.

27-22-05.
Responsibilities of state departments, agencies, and officers. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1969, ch. 291, § 5; repealed by 2015, ch. 230, § 5, effective August 1, 2015.

27-22-06.
Additional procedures not precluded. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1969, ch. 291, § 6; repealed by 2015, ch. 230, § 5, effective August 1, 2015.

27-22-07.
Interstate rendition of juvenile delinquents. [Repealed]

Source:

1993, ch. 322, § 1; repealed by 2015, ch. 230, § 5, effective August 1, 2015.